District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.04a

Behavioral health screening and assessment requirements.

(a)

(1)

All youth in contact with the Department shall, to the extent that it is not inconsistent with a court order, receive a behavioral health screening and, if necessary, a behavioral health assessment within 30 days of initial contact; provided, that the Mayor may, through rulemaking, require that the behavioral health screening and assessment be conducted within fewer than 30 days of the initial contact.

(2)

As part of the behavioral health screening required by paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department shall identify youth who are victims of, or who may be at risk for becoming victims of, sex trafficking of children under § 22-1834.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “youth” means an individual under 18 years of age residing in the District and those individuals classified as committed youth in the custody of the Department who are 21 years of age or younger.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 104a
as added June 7, 2012, D.C. Law 19-141, § 504(c), 59 DCR 3083
May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-276, § 3, 62 DCR 479

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-276 added (a)(2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-141, § 601, see § 4112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 4111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle K of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “South Capitol Street Memorial Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141 provided: “Sec. 601. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141 originally provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7004, provided that the applicability of only §§ 302(b)(1), 304, and 502(a) are contingent upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7016 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that Sections 7001, 7004, 7007, 7009, 7011, and 7015 of the act shall apply as of June 19, 2012.

Section 601 of D.C. Law 19-141, as amended by D.C. Law 20-61, § 4112, provided that §§ 302(b)(1)(A) and (C) and 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 shall apply to public charter schools upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register. Section 302(b)(1)(A) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(A-i); Section 302(b)(1)(C) of D.C. Law 19-141 added § 38-203(i)(B-i); and Section 304(b)(1)(D) of D.C. Law 19-141 added 5 DCMR § A2103(c)(6).